District of Columbia statutes.
8-102.06a

Establishment of Anacostia pilot program.

(a)

The District Department of the Environment shall:

(1)

Establish a pilot program that permits entities to adopt a section of the Anacostia River for the purpose of removing bottles and other trash; and

(2)

Select an entity to participate in the pilot program whose organizational mission is related to the restoration and preservation of District waterways.

(b)

The pilot program shall include financial incentives and continue for at least 6 months.

(c)

After completion of the pilot program, the District Department of the Environment may extend the program indefinitely and expand it to include other District waterways.

History

Sept. 23, 2009, D.C. Law 18-55, § 7a
as added Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-188, § 2(c), 59 DCR 10151

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-102.05.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-188 added this section.